Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 14.1 Public Motor Vehicles

39-14.1-1.
Definitions.

Terms used in this chapter shall be construed as follows, unless another meaning is expressed or is clearly apparent from the language or context:

“Certificate” means a certificate of operating authority issued to a public motor vehicle.

“Charter carrier” means a provider of transportation services to groups such as: lodges, bands, athletic teams, schools, or other travel groups, assembled by someone other than the carrier who or that collectively contracts for the exclusive use of certain equipment for the duration of a particular trip or tour. Charter carrier services shall also include transportation services provided by employment agencies or employers to individuals in the context of providing transportation to and from their place of employment.

“Common carrier,” as used in this chapter, means any person engaging in the business of providing transportation services for compensation to passengers through the use of a public motor vehicle as defined in this chapter.

“Division” means the division of public utilities and carriers.

“Driver” means any person operating a motor vehicle used for the transportation of passengers that he or she owns or is operating with the expressed or implied consent of the owner.

“Person” means and includes any individual, partnership, corporation, or other association of individuals.

“Public motor vehicle” means and includes every motor vehicle for hire, other than a jitney, as defined in §

39-13-1

, or a taxicab or limited public motor vehicle, as defined in §

39-14-1

, used for transporting members of the general public for compensation in unmarked vehicles at a predetermined or prearranged charge to such points as may be directed by the passenger. All vehicles operated under this chapter shall conform to specifications established by the division. Transportation services provided by charter carriers, as defined in this chapter, or by funeral homes, in association with funeral services, and by ambulance companies shall be exempt from this chapter.

“Unmarked vehicles” means motor vehicles that do not display the transportation company’s name, address, or telephone number, or any advertisements or commercial information beyond that included by the vehicle’s manufacturer on the vehicle’s exterior surfaces; provided, however, that public motor vehicles that display markings identifying them as service or courtesy vehicles used by licensed healthcare facilities, assisted-living residences, and adult daycare programs, licensed by the Rhode Island department of health, pursuant to chapters 17 and 17.4 of title 23 and §

23-1-52

, respectively, shall be permitted to operate with such markings; provided the vehicles are registered to these licensed entities; operated by employees of these licensed entities; and that the service provided with these vehicles, when being used as public motor vehicles, is limited to transportation services provided to passengers receiving transportation services through a program funded by the federal government and/or the state of Rhode Island; provided, further, that public motor vehicles providing transportation services under a program funded by the federal government and/or the state of Rhode Island may display temporary and easily removable markings (e.g., magnetic placards) on their vehicles, for the sole purpose of identifying the vehicles as authorized transportation service vehicles operating in association with the publicly funded program.

“Wheelchair-accessible public motor vehicle” means a public motor vehicle designed and equipped to allow the transportation of a person(s) who uses a wheelchair without requiring that person(s) to be removed from the wheelchair, but the public motor vehicle is not restricted to transporting only persons using wheelchairs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 266, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 233, § 1.

39-14.1-2.
Powers of division.

Every person owning or operating a motor vehicle engaged as a public motor vehicle is declared a common carrier and subject to the jurisdiction of the division of public utilities and carriers. The division may prescribe any rules and regulations that it deems proper to ensure adequate, economical, safe, and efficient service. Charter carriers, as defined in this chapter, shall be exempted from the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 182, § 1.

39-14.1-3.
Certificate required for public motor vehicle operation — Application and fee.

No person shall operate a public motor vehicle in any city or town in the state until the person shall have obtained a certificate from the division certifying that the applicant is fit, willing, and able to provide the services as a public motor vehicle in the transportation of passengers. The certificate shall be issued only after written application for it, accompanied by a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), and after a public hearing has been conducted on it. All revenues under this section shall be deposited as general revenues. Certificates issued under this chapter shall be renewed before the close of business on December 31, of each calendar year. The renewal fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100) and shall be submitted with the renewal form. All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 182, § 1.

39-14.1-4.
Hearing on application.

Upon receipt of an application, the division shall, within a reasonable time, fix the time and place for the hearing. Notice of the hearing shall be given by first-class mail to the applicant and shall be published in a newspaper with statewide distribution.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 182, § 1.

39-14.1-5.
Safety and sanitary condition of vehicles — Inspection.

The division of motor vehicles shall have jurisdiction over the lighting, equipment, safety, and sanitary condition of all public motor vehicles and shall cause an inspection of it to be made before registering it, and from time to time thereafter, as it shall deem necessary for the convenience, protection, and safety of passengers and of the public. A fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) shall be paid to the division of motor vehicles for each annual inspection.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 182, § 1.

39-14.1-6.
Operations of public motor vehicles.

No public motor vehicle shall be operated from any taxicab stand on any public highway; nor shall the operator of it transport any passenger for hire unless the transportation is requested by the passenger at an office of the owner of the vehicle, either personally or by telephone and/or other electronic means. When solicited by a prospective customer, the certificate holder or its representative shall quote what the actual charge for the requested transportation service will be prior to picking up the passenger(s).

The division shall establish and set a minimum allowable charge for public motor vehicle services. The minimum allowable charge provisions of this section shall not apply to public motor vehicle service coordinated by, or paid for by, a state department, authority, or agency on behalf of clients of the state department, authority, or agency; provided, however, that the state department, authority, or agency requests the service no later than the day before the service is to be rendered. This exemption shall also apply in cases where the state has contracted with a private company to coordinate the scheduling and provision of such transportation services, provided the funding for such transportation services comes exclusively through a program funded by the federal government and/or the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 233, § 1.

39-14.1-7.
Proof of financial responsibility.

The owner of any public motor vehicle, operating under this section, shall file with the division of public utilities and carriers a certificate of insurance issued by an insurance company authorized to transact business in this state, showing that the owner has a policy insuring the public motor vehicle company against liability for injury to persons and damage to property that may be caused by the operation of the public motor vehicle, this policy to provide for the indemnity in the sum of not less than one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) for personal injury and indemnity of not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for damage to property.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 182, § 1.

39-14.1-8.
Licensing of operators.

No person shall operate a public motor vehicle upon the public highways until the person shall have first obtained an operator’s license as provided for in chapter 10 of title 31. Further, no person shall operate a public motor vehicle upon the highways until the person shall have first obtained a special license from the division of public utilities and carriers under any rules and regulations that the division of public utilities and carriers shall require.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 182, § 1.

39-14.1-9.
Penalty for violations.

Any person, firm, or corporation, subject to the provisions of this chapter and/or any rules and regulations promulgated under it, who shall knowingly or willfully cause to be done any act prohibited by this chapter, or who shall be guilty of any violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for a term not exceeding one year, or both for each offense.

The administrator may, in his or her discretion, in lieu of seeking criminal sanctions, and/or in lieu of revoking or suspending the carrier’s operating authority as conferred under this chapter, impose upon its regulated common carriers an administrative civil penalty (fine). This fine shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per each violation of the sections contained in this chapter or the division’s rules and regulations promulgated under it.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 182, § 1.

39-14.1-10.
Certification of business previously established.

The business of operating any public motor vehicle not subject to regulation shall now be subject to the provisions of this chapter. However, businesses that have been providing continuous transportation services akin to the public motor vehicle services defined and described in this chapter since January 1, 2002, shall have ninety (90) days from the passage of this legislation to file a relevant application with the division. These businesses may continue to operate without a certificate during the ninety-day (90) period mentioned above and through the period of time required by the division to issue a final decision on the application.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 182, § 1.